Missouri, session 2026, SB1043.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 565, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 565.097, to read as
follows:
565.097. 1. A person commits the offense of masked
intimidation if that person intentionally harasses,
intimidates, or threatens any other person or group of
persons while hiding or concealing their face with a mask or
any other article or device for the purpose of concealing
their identity and with the intent to place another person
or group of persons in reasonable fear for their physical
safety.
2. A person who commits the offense of masked
intimidation shall be guilty of a class E felony for the
first offense, a class D felony for the second offense, and
a class C felony for a third or subsequent offense.
3. For purposes of this section, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Harass", to engage in a knowing and willful
pattern of conduct directed at a particular person or
particular group of persons that is intended to cause that

SB 1043 2
person or that group of persons to reasonably fear for their
safety or suffer substantial emotional distress;
(2) "Intimidate", to willfully and substantially
interfere, by threats, intimidation, or coercion, with the
exercise or enjoyment by any other person or persons of
rights secured by the constitution or laws of the United
States, or of rights secured by the constitution or laws of
the state of Missouri, because of that person or person’s
actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin,
ethnicity, sex, gender, gender identity or expression,
sexual orientation, or disability;
(3) "Threaten", to communicate a clear intention to
cause imminent bodily harm to another person.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
any person or persons wearing a mask or otherwise covering
one's face for any purpose other than a purpose specified in
subsection 1 of this section, in cases where a person is:
(1) Wearing a mask or face covering on or near the
occasion of a holiday, celebration or other event involving
costumes;
(2) Wearing a mask, hood, article, or other device for
the purpose of ensuring the physical safety of the wearer or
because of the nature of the person's occupation, trade, or
profession;
(3) Wearing a mask, hood, article, or other device for
the purpose of protection from the weather elements or while
participating in a winter sport;
(4) Wearing a mask, hood, article, or other device in
an artistic or theatrical production or celebration;
(5) Wearing a gas mask or other protective facial
covering for the purposes of protection during or related to

SB 1043 3
an emergency situation, or during emergency management
drills;
(6) Wearing a mask for the purpose of ensuring one's
physical health and safety or the health and safety of
others, including, but not limited to, limiting the spread
of airborne illnesses; or
(7) Wearing any garb for religious purposes.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the
First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
any right protected under the constitution of Missouri.
✓